District of Columbia statutes.
11-910

Clerks and secretaries for judges.

Each judge of the Superior Court may appoint and remove a personal law clerk and a personal secretary.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 484, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
1981 Ed., § 11-910.
1973 Ed., § 11-910.